Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-916
Warrants; amount authorized; rate of interest.

All warrants for the payment of any indebtedness of such a cemetery district, which are unpaid for want of funds, shall bear interest, but not to exceed six percent per annum, from the date of the registering of such unpaid warrants with the cemetery district treasurer. The amount of such warrants shall not exceed the revenue provided for the year in which the indebtedness was incurred.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 8, p. 141.